Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Chapter 65. Actions, Immunities, Defenses, and Duties.
Sec. 09.65.315.
Damages resulting from driving the vehicle of a person under the influence of an alcoholic beverage.

A person is not liable beyond the limits of any applicable insurance policy purchased by or on behalf of the owner of the vehicle, or the taxicab or limousine company or the company’s owner, agents, or employees, for damages resulting from a motor vehicle accident if the person was driving a vehicle involved in the accident and

before the accident, started driving the vehicle involved in the accident from or near licensed premises;

is, at the time of the accident, a person employed in the course and scope of employment to or under contract to drive a taxicab or limousine, a taxicab or limousine owner, a holder of a taxicab or limousine permit issued by a municipality, or an owner or employee of a company that dispatches taxicabs or limousines;

was not under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, inhalant, or controlled substance at the time of the accident;

was driving the vehicle to the motor vehicle owner’s residence or designated residential location at the request of the motor vehicle owner or operator or a law enforcement officer; and

was driving the vehicle because the motor vehicle owner or operator was under the influence of an alcoholic beverage or reasonably believed to be under the influence of an alcoholic beverage.

A person licensed under AS

04.09.020

—

04.09.370

, or an agent or employee of the person, is not liable for damages resulting from a motor vehicle accident described under (a) of this section. A person or entity that participates in making arrangements for transportation of a vehicle under (a) of this section is not liable for damages resulting from a motor vehicle accident described in (a) of this section.

This section does not

preclude liability for civil damages as a result of gross negligence or reckless or intentional misconduct;

limit the ability of a person to recover damages under any applicable uninsured or underinsured motor vehicle insurance coverage; or

limit the ability of a person to recover damages under any applicable liability insurance coverage purchased by or on behalf of the person being transported under (a) of this section.

A motor vehicle owner is considered to have given consent to another person to drive the owner’s motor vehicle if the other person is involved in an accident and the provisions of (a) of this section apply to the other person.

In this section,

“controlled substance” has the meaning given in AS

28.33.190

;

“inhalant” has the meaning given to the phrase “hazardous volatile material or substance” in AS

47.37.270

;

“licensed premises” has the meaning given in AS

04.21.080

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 15 SLA 2011; am § 151 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 09.65.320.
Nonrecovery for damages for noneconomic losses resulting from operating a motor vehicle while uninsured.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, in an action to recover damages for personal injury or wrongful death, a person who suffers personal injury or death or the person’s personal representative under AS

09.55.570

or

09.55.580

may not recover damages for noneconomic losses if the injury or death occurred while the person was operating a motor vehicle and the person knew that the person was not in compliance with the motor vehicle liability insurance provisions of AS

28.22.011

or, if applicable, the motor vehicle liability insurance provisions of AS 28.20. In this subsection, “damages for noneconomic losses” means the compensation claimed for the losses identified in AS

09.17.010(a)

.

The prohibition against the recovery of noneconomic losses in (a) of this section does not apply if the person who is liable for the personal injury or wrongful death

was driving while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, inhalant, or controlled substance;

acted intentionally, recklessly, or with gross negligence;

fled from the scene of the accident; or

was acting in furtherance of an offense or in immediate flight from an offense that constitutes a felony as defined in AS

11.81.900

at the time of the accident.

History.

(§ 1 ch 172 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

09.65.300

and renumbered in 2004.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 6, ch. 172, SLA 2004, provides that this section applies “to a civil action that accrues on or after October 24, 2004.”

Sec. 09.65.325.
Immunity relating to use or nonuse of investigational drugs, biological products, and devices.

A person is not liable in an action for damages for the injury or death of a patient with a terminal illness resulting from the patient’s use of an investigational drug, biological product, or device for the purpose of sustaining the patient’s life if the person, acting in good faith and with reasonable care, is a

physician or member of the medical team who prescribed, dispensed, or administered the investigational drug, biological product, or device, or provided related treatment, to the patient and, before prescribing, dispensing, or administering the drug, product, or device, or providing related treatment, the physician or member of the medical team

obtained the informed consent of the patient in writing after presenting to the patient all treatment options currently approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for treatment of the patient’s terminal illness; and

provided to the patient written notice of the immunity provided under this section; or

manufacturer, importer, or distributor of the investigational drug, biological product, or device and, before providing the drug, product, or device to the patient’s physician, presented to the physician all treatment options currently approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for treatment of the patient’s terminal illness and provided to the patient written notice of the immunity provided under this section.

A person, acting in good faith and with reasonable care, is not liable in an action for damages solely for declining to

prescribe, dispense, or administer an investigational drug, biological product, or device to a patient; or

provide an investigational drug, biological product, or device to a patient’s physician.

In this section, “investigational drug, biological product, or device” and “terminal illness” have the meanings given in AS

08.64.367

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 53 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 2,
ch. 53, SLA 2018, which enacted this section, took effect on October 11, 2018.

Sec. 09.65.330.
Immunity: Use of defensive force.

A person who uses force in defense of self, other persons, or property as permitted in AS 11.81 is not liable for the death of or injury to the person against whom the force was intended to be used, unless the person against whom force was used was

a peace officer, whether on or off duty, who was engaged in the performance of official duties;

a firefighter, emergency medical technician, or paramedic engaged in the performance of official duties; or

medical personnel, a health care provider, or a first responder in an emergency situation.

The court shall award reasonable attorney fees, court costs, compensation for loss of income, and all expenses incurred by the defendant in defense of a civil action brought by a plaintiff if the court finds that the defendant is not liable under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 68 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, under AS

01.05.031(b)

, the revisor of statutes substituted “firefighter” for “fire fighter” in this section.

Sec. 09.65.340.
Immunity for prescribing, providing, or administering an opioid overdose drug.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, a person is not liable for civil damages resulting from an act or omission in prescribing or providing an opioid overdose drug to a person at risk of experiencing an opioid overdose or to a family member, friend, caregiver, or other person in a position to administer an opioid overdose drug to a person at risk of experiencing an opioid overdose if

the person

prescribing or providing the opioid overdose drug is a health care provider; or

providing the opioid overdose drug is an employee or volunteer of an opioid overdose program; and

each person to whom the opioid overdose drug is prescribed or provided has been educated and trained in the proper emergency use and administration of the opioid overdose drug by the health care provider or the opioid overdose program; education and training under this paragraph may be provided by any reasonable means, including through the use of electronic, video, or automated education or training resources.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, a person who administers an opioid overdose drug to another person who the person reasonably believes is experiencing an opioid overdose emergency is not liable for civil damages resulting from an act or omission in the emergency administration of the opioid overdose drug.

This section does not preclude liability for civil damages that are the result of gross negligence or reckless or intentional misconduct.

In this section,

“health care provider” means a licensed physician, osteopath, dentist, advanced nurse practitioner, physician assistant, nurse, village health aide, or pharmacist operating within the scope of the health care provider’s authority;

“opioid” includes the opium and opiate substances and opium and opiate derivatives listed in AS

11.71.140

;

“opioid overdose drug” means a drug that reverses, in whole or in part, the pharmacological effects of an opioid overdose;

“opioid overdose program” means a program that provides opioid overdose drugs to persons at risk of experiencing an opioid overdose or to a family member, friend, or other person in a position to assist a person at risk of experiencing an opioid overdose.

History.

(§ 5 ch 2 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For a provision relating to prescription of opioid overdose drugs, see AS

17.20.085

.

Effective dates. —

Section 7, ch. 2, SLA 2016, makes this section effective March 15, 2016, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Sec. 09.65.350.
Immunity for certain actions related to transportation network companies.

The state or a municipality, and the officers, employees, and agents of the state or a municipality, are not liable in tort for damages for the injury to or death of a person or property damage resulting from an act, omission, or failure of a transportation network company or driver to comply with the requirements of AS 28.23 or other law.

In this section, “transportation network company” and “driver” have the meanings given in AS

28.23.180

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 10 SLA 2017)

Effective dates. —

Section 9, ch. 10, SLA 2017 makes this section effective June 16, 2017.